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DTC 88 Engine ECU Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
ECT ECU communicates the information such as acceleration pedal opening angle, engine coolant temper-
ature,cruisecontrol,O/Dsignal, lock −upcontrolandair conditionersignal,etc.withEngineECU.
This DTC is output when communication stops between ECT ECU and Engine ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

88

All conditions below are detected 5 seconds or more continu-
ously.
(a) No communication from ECU
(b) Engine speed: 500 rpm or more
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check Engine ECU.

CHECK:
Check that the engine starts normally.
HINT:
By this inspection, whether Engine ECU works normally or not can be diagnosed.

NG Check and replace Engine ECU
(See page IN−35).

OK

2 Check harness and connector between Engine ECU and ECT ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO−127).
(b) Disconnect the connector of Engine ECU and connector

of ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Check the harness and connector between terminal ECT+ or
ECT− of ECT ECU and terminal ECT+ or ECT− of Engine ECU.
OK:

There is no open and no short circuit.

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector.

OK

Check or replace the ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).


